Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF477.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2697YH (4) 91 ss/ns H.F. 477 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 331.301A Secession. 1 1. A county may, by adoption of an ordinance, secede from 2 the state of Iowa. Upon the effective date of an ordinance 3 to secede from the state of Iowa, a county shall cease to be 4 a political subdivision of the state for all purposes and the 5 county and the residents of the county shall not be subject to 6 the laws or Constitution of the State of Iowa. 7 2. All property, real or personal, that is owned by the 8 state of Iowa that is located in a county that secedes from the 9 state of Iowa shall remain under the ownership and control of 10 the state of Iowa. 11 3. An ordinance to secede from the state of Iowa shall have 12 an effective date of not less than one year after the date of 13 adoption. 14 4. This section does not apply unless the county has 15 approval from the federal government and another state to 16 become part of the other state, or unless the county has 17 approval from the federal government to become its own state 18 or territory. 19